Oklahoma, session 2026, SB228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Covenant


Marriage Act of Oklahoma”.


B. The Legislature of the State of Oklahoma finds that marriage


is a lifelong commitment and the foundation of a stable and healthy

Req. No. 1344 Page 1


society. To strengthen the institution of marriage and to promote


the religious freedom of those who wish to enter into a marital


union under religious terms, this act establishes the option of a


covenant marriage, which emphasizes the sacredness and utmost


importance to the flourishing of individuals and societies of the


institution of marriage.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 21 of Title 43, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this act, “Declaration of Intent” means a


document signed by both parties at the time of applying for a


covenant marriage license that affirms their commitment to the


principles of a covenant marriage.


B. The Declaration of Intent for a covenant marriage shall


include the following statement to be signed by both parties:


“We do solemnly declare that marriage is a lifelong covenant


made before God. We have chosen each other carefully and


disclosed to one another everything that could adversely affect


the decision to enter into this marriage. We have received


premarital counseling on the nature, purposes, and


responsibilities of marriage. We have read the Covenant


Marriage Act of Oklahoma, and we understand that a covenant


marriage is for life. If we experience marital difficulties, we


commit ourselves to take all reasonable efforts to preserve our

Req. No. 1344 Page 2


marriage, including marital counseling. With full knowledge of


what this commitment means, we do hereby declare that our


marriage will be bound by the laws of the State of Oklahoma on


covenant marriages, and we promise to love, honor, and care for


one another as spouses for the rest of our lives.”


Both parties must sign the document in the presence of two witnesses


and a notary public.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 22 of Title 43, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Couples intending to enter into a covenant marriage shall,


in addition to submitting other marriage-related documents required


by law:


1. Sign a Declaration of Intent. Both parties must sign the


Declaration of Intent, as outlined in Section 2 of this act;


2. Undergo premarital counseling. The parties shall complete


marriage counseling from a minister, clergy member, or counselor;


and


3. File the Declaration of Intent. The signed declaration must


be filed with the marriage license application at the county clerk’s


office.


B. A marriage license issued under this section shall clearly


indicate it is a covenant marriage license and shall be in strict


facial compliance with the requirements of Section 3 of Title 43 of

Req. No. 1344 Page 3


the Oklahoma Statutes. An application for a covenant marriage


license shall include the following statement: “We, (name of


intended spouse) and (name of intended spouse), do hereby declare


our intent to contract a covenant marriage and, accordingly, have


executed a Declaration of Intent attached hereto.”


C. An existing marriage license may be converted to a covenant


marriage license upon the agreement of both spouses. To convert an


existing marriage license, the couple shall:


1. Sign the Declaration of Intent;


2. Complete counseling on the nature and responsibilities of a


covenant marriage; and


3. File the signed Declaration of Intent with the county


clerk’s office.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 23 of Title 43, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The State Commissioner of Health shall promulgate rules for the


administration of covenant marriage licenses and maintain records of


covenant marriage declarations.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 101.1 of Title 43, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:





Req. No. 1344 Page 4


A. Divorce in a Covenant Marriage shall only be granted if one


spouse can demonstrate by a preponderance of the evidence that the


other spouse has committed one or more of the following acts:


1. Abandonment. The spouse has abandoned the petitioner for a


continuous period of at least one (1) year without justification,


which shall include, but not be limited to, time in prison;


2. Abuse. The spouse has committed physical or sexual abuse


against the petitioner or their child; or


3. Adultery. The spouse has committed adultery during the


marriage.


B. Couples in a covenant marriage shall be encouraged to seek


counseling in the event of marital difficulties. Marital counseling


shall be required prior to filing for divorce, except in cases


involving abuse or criminal conviction. Counseling shall be


provided by a minister, clergy member, or counselor.


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.414 of Title 68, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For tax year 2025 and subsequent tax years, there shall be


allowed a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to Section 2355 of


Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes for individual taxpayers in a


marriage resulting from the issuance of a covenant marriage license


pursuant to the provisions of Section 3 of this act.



Req. No. 1344 Page 5


B. The credit authorized pursuant to subsection A of this


section shall be in the amount of Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars


($2,500.00) for taxpayers filing as married filing jointly or One


Thousand Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($1,250.00) for each taxpayer


filing as married filing separately.


C. Claims for credit authorized pursuant to this section shall


be made on a form prescribed by the Oklahoma Tax Commission and


shall include written certification that the taxpayers are married


through the issuance of a covenant marriage license as provided


pursuant to Section 3 of this act.


D. The credit allowed pursuant to the provisions of this


section shall not be used to reduce the income tax liability of the


taxpayer to less than zero (0).


E. If the amount of the credit allowed pursuant to this section


exceeds the income tax liability, the amount of credit not used in


any tax year may be carried forward, in order, to each of the five


(5) subsequent tax years.


SECTION 7. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 8. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1344 TEK 12/30/2024 4:59:01 PM

Req. No. 1344 Page 6